Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
ARTICLE 40
STATE LOTTERY DIVISION

Editor's note:

This article 40 was added with relocations in 2018. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article 40, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Section

44-40-101. Definitions.

As used in this article 40, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Cash prize" means any prize paid in cash in its entirety, including any expenditures made to fund Colorado or multistate prize reserves.

"Commission" means the Colorado lottery commission.

"Director" means the director of the state lottery division.

"Division" means the state lottery division.

"Lottery" means any and all lotteries created and operated pursuant to this article 40, including, without limitation, the game commonly known as lotto, in which prizes are awarded on the basis of designated numbers conforming to numbers selected at random, electronically or otherwise, by or at the direction of the commission, and any multistate lottery or game that is authorized by a multistate agreement to which the division is party. All references in this article 40 to "the lottery" shall be construed to include any or all lotteries within the meaning of this subsection (5). "Lottery" shall not include a promotional drawing as defined in subsection (8) of this section.

"Multistate agreement" means an agreement entered into by the division and at least one other state's lottery authority that authorizes the division to allow Colorado residents to participate in one or more multistate lotteries pursuant to rules promulgated by the commission.

"Noncash prize" means any prize paid in merchandise or a combination of cash and merchandise.

"Promotional drawing" means a prize promotion involving the conduct of giveaways through the use of free chances, including the use of nonwinning tickets from existing or prior games, for purposes of commercial advertisement of the lottery, the creation of goodwill, the promotion of new lottery products, or the collection of names.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1027), ch. 31, p. 334, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 24-35-201 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-40-102. State lottery division - creation - location - enterprise status.

There is hereby created, within the department, the state lottery division, the head of which is the director of the state lottery division, who shall be appointed and subject to removal by the executive director in accordance with section 13 of article XII of the state constitution. The state lottery division shall be headquartered in the city of Pueblo in facilities provided at the expense of the lottery division.

The state lottery division and the Colorado lottery commission, created in section 44-40-108, shall constitute an enterprise for the purposes of section 20 of article X of the state constitution, so long as the commission retains the authority to issue revenue bonds and the division receives less than ten percent of its total annual revenues in grants, as defined in section 24-77-102 (7), from all Colorado state and local governments combined. So long as it constitutes an enterprise pursuant to this section, the state lottery division and the Colorado lottery commission shall not be subject to any of the provisions of section 20 of article X of the state constitution.

The state lottery division, including the Colorado lottery commission created in section 44-40-108, and the director of the state lottery division are type 2 entities, as defined in section 24-1-105, and exercise their powers and perform their duties and functions specified in this article 40 under the department; except that the commission has full and exclusive authority to promulgate rules related to the lottery without any approval by, or delegation of authority from, the department.

For purposes of part 2 of article 72 of title 24, the records of the division and the commission shall be public records, as defined in section 24-72-202 (6), regardless of whether the state lottery division and the Colorado lottery commission constitute an enterprise pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1027), ch. 31, p. 335, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:

(2) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3363, § 37, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 24-35-202 as it existed prior to 2018.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

44-40-103. Function of division.

The function of the division is to establish, operate, and supervise the lottery authorized by section 2 of article XVIII of the state constitution, as approved by the electors.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1027), ch. 31, p. 336, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 24-35-203 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-40-104. Director - qualifications - powers and duties.

The director shall be qualified by training and experience to direct a lottery and the work of the division; and, notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-5-101, shall be of good character and shall not have been convicted of any felony or gambling-related offense.

The director shall devote his or her entire time and attention to the duties of his or her office and shall not be engaged in any other profession or occupation.

The director may promote the lottery by:

Establishing promotional drawings. The general assembly hereby finds and declares that promotional drawings shall not be subject to regulation under this article 40. No award of prizes through a promotional drawing shall be deemed a lottery or game of chance.

Selling memorabilia or other promotional items. Any revenue generated from the sale of the items shall be transmitted to the state treasurer to be credited to the lottery fund created in section 44-40-111 (1).

The director, as administrative head of the division, shall direct and supervise all its administrative and technical activities. In addition to the duties imposed upon the director elsewhere in this article 40, it shall be the director's duty:

To supervise and administer the operation of the lottery in accordance with the provisions of this article 40 and the rules of the commission, state fiscal rules, state personnel rules, and state procurement rules, to perform all duties and obligations pursuant to and administer any multistate agreements, and to provide for all expenses incurred in connection with any multistate agreements unless the expenses are otherwise provided for in the multistate agreements;

To attend meetings of the commission or to appoint a designee to attend in his or her place;

To employ and direct the personnel as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this article 40, but no person shall be employed who has been convicted of a felony or gambling-related offense, notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-5-101. The director by agreement may secure and, pursuant to section 44-40-111 (2), provide payment for any services that the director may deem necessary from any department, agency, or unit of the state government and may employ and compensate consultants and technical assistants as may be required and as otherwise permitted by law. The director shall ensure that the division conducts full criminal background investigations of vendors, officers of licensed sales agents, members of the commission, and division employees as are necessary to ensure the security and integrity of the operation of the state lottery. The executive director may request the division of gaming to perform the investigations on members of the commission, division employees, and vendors.

To license, in accordance with the provisions of section 44-40-107 and the rules of the commission, as agents to sell lottery tickets persons that in his or her opinion will best serve the public convenience and promote the sale of tickets or shares;

To deny, suspend, or revoke any lottery license subject to the provisions of section 24-4-104. The director may designate an administrative law judge, pursuant to part 10 of article 30 of title 24, to take evidence and to make findings and report them to the director.

To confer, as necessary or desirable and not less than once each month, with the commission on the operation of the lottery;

To make available for inspection by the commission or any member of the commission, upon request, all books, records, files, and other information and documents of his or her office;

To advise the commission and recommend rules and other matters as he or she deems necessary and advisable to improve the operation of the lottery;

To make a continuous study and investigation of the operation and the administration of similar laws that may be in effect in other states or countries, any literature on the subject that from time to time may be published or available, and any federal laws that may affect the operation of the lottery, and the reaction of Colorado citizens to existing and potential features of the lottery with a view to recommending or effecting changes that will tend to serve the purposes of this article 40;

To take any action that may be necessary to protect the security and integrity of the lottery games;

To determine the manner of payment of prizes to the holders of winning tickets or shares, which determination shall include consideration of whether a prize should be awarded as a lump sum or as an amortized annuity in light of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, and the rules promulgated pursuant thereto;

To determine any other matters that are necessary or desirable for the efficient and economical operation and administration of the lottery; and

To perform any other lawful acts that he or she and the commission may consider necessary or desirable to carry out the purposes and provisions of this article 40.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1027), ch. 31, p. 336, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 24-35-204 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-40-105. Executive director - duties.

It shall be the executive director's duty:

To enter into contracts for materials, equipment, and supplies to be used in the operation of the lottery, for the design and installation of games or lotteries, and for promotion of the lottery. No contract shall be legal or enforceable that provides for the management of the lottery or for the entire operation of its games by any private person, firm, or corporation, because management of the lottery and control over the operation of its games shall remain with the state; except that management of and control over the operation of a multistate lottery shall be determined by the terms of a multistate agreement. Except for advertising and promotional contracts, when a contract other than a multistate agreement is awarded, a performance bond satisfactory to the executive director, executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state or otherwise secured in a manner satisfactory to the state, in an amount set annually by the executive director shall be delivered to the state and shall become binding on the parties upon execution of the contract.

To annually prepare and submit to the commission a proposed budget for the ensuing fiscal year, which budget shall present a complete financial plan setting forth all proposed expenditures and anticipated revenues of the division. The fiscal year of the division shall commence on July 1 and end on June 30 of each year.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1027), ch. 31, p. 338, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 24-35-204.5 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-40-106. Contractors supplying services, equipment, or materials - gaming equipment - disclosures - record check - definitions.

Any person, firm, association, or corporation, referred to in this section as "supplier", that enters into a contract to supply services, equipment, or materials or gaming materials or equipment for use in the operation of the state lottery shall first disclose to the division:

In addition to the supplier's business name and address, the names and addresses of the following:

If the supplier is a partnership, all of the general and limited partners;

If the supplier is a limited liability company, all of the members;

If the supplier is a trust, the trustee and all persons entitled to receive income or benefit from the trust;

If the supplier is an association, the members, officers, and directors;

If the supplier is a corporation, the officers, directors, and each owner or holder, directly or indirectly, of any equity security or other evidence of ownership of any interest in the corporation; except that, in the case of owners or holders of publicly held equity securities of a publicly traded corporation, only the names and addresses of those owning or holding five percent or more of the publicly held securities need be disclosed;

If the supplier is a subsidiary or intermediary company, the intermediary company, holding company, or parent company involved therewith, and the officers, directors, and stockholders of each; except that, in the case of owners or holders of publicly held securities of an intermediary company or holding company that is a publicly traded corporation, only the names and addresses of those owning or holding five percent or more of the publicly held securities need be disclosed;

If the supplier is a corporation, all the states in which the supplier is incorporated to do business, and the nature of that business;

Other jurisdictions in which the supplier has contracts to supply gaming materials or equipment;

The details of any criminal conviction, state or federal, of the supplier or any person whose name and address are required by subsection (1)(a) of this section. This subsection (1)(d) applies irrespective of any of the laws of the state to the contrary regarding expungement or sealed records.

The details of any disciplinary action taken by any state against the supplier or any person whose name and address are required by subsection (1)(a) of this section regarding any matter related to the selling, leasing, offering for sale or lease, buying, or servicing of gaming materials or equipment;

A statement of the gross receipts realized in the preceding year from the sale, lease, or distribution of gaming materials or equipment to states operating lotteries and to private persons licensed to conduct gambling, which statement shall differentiate that portion of the gross receipts attributable to transactions with states operating lotteries from that portion of the gross receipts attributable to transactions with private persons licensed to conduct gambling;

The name and address of any source of gaming materials or equipment for the supplier;

The number of years the supplier has been in the business of supplying gaming materials or equipment;

Any other information, accompanied by any documents, that the commission, by rule, may require as being necessary or appropriate in the public interest to accomplish the purposes of this article 40.

If the supplier is a subsidiary or intermediary company, the intermediary company, holding company, or parent company involved therewith shall supply the same information required by this section of the supplier.

The costs of any investigation into the background of the apparent successful bidder shall be assessed against the bidder and shall be paid by the bidder at the time of billing by the state. The investigation may be conducted by the department or the attorney general, and no contract may be signed until the investigation is completed. Investigators shall have peace officer authority during the period of investigation.

No person, firm, association, or corporation contracting to supply services, equipment, or materials or gaming equipment or materials to the state for use in the operation of the state lottery shall be directly or indirectly connected with any person, firm, association, or corporation licensed as a sales agent under this article 40, any employee of the department, the director, or the members of the commission.

No contract shall be formed with any supplier if:

A person disclosed pursuant to subsection (1)(a) or (1)(g) of this section is a person who has been convicted of a felony or gambling-related offense, who has engaged in any form of illegal gambling, who is not of good character and reputation relevant to the secure and efficient operation of the lottery, or who has been convicted of a crime involving fraud or misrepresentation. However, when a felony conviction, other than a gambling-related offense, is an issue in the formation of a contract with a supplier, the director may determine that the supplier is otherwise of good character and reputation. The director's determination shall be submitted to a three-member panel who shall approve or reject the determination. The panel's decision shall constitute final agency action for purposes of section 24-4-106. The panel shall be composed of the chairman of the lottery commission, the executive director, and the secretary of state. Upon the determination and approval, the director may enter into a contract with the supplier.

A disciplinary action disclosed pursuant to subsection (1)(e) of this section was resolved adversely to the supplier.

No contract for the supply of services, equipment, or materials or gaming materials or equipment for use in the operation of the state lottery shall be enforceable against the state if the provisions of this section are not complied with.

In the case of any procurement for a contract for lottery tickets, lottery consulting services, or lottery terminals or equipment having a value of one hundred thousand dollars or more, or in the case of procurement for a contract for drawing equipment regardless of value, each prospective corporate supplier shall, prior to entering into a contract, provide a verified affidavit as to ownership, if any, of any interest, direct or indirect, in any operator of a casino, jai alai fronton, racetrack, or other gaming establishment, a current personal financial statement, and individual federal and state income tax returns from the past three years for each of its officers and each of the directors. The executive director shall determine, depending upon the organization of each company, by rule, which officers of any parent, intermediary, and holding companies, and which directors of the supplier or of a parent, intermediary, or holding company, are affiliated with the lottery and are required to file a current personal financial statement and individual federal and state income tax returns from the past three years. The provision of said affidavit, financial statement, and tax returns shall not be required at the time of submission of the prospective corporate supplier's bid or proposal.

Any contractor that has entered into a contract to supply gaming materials or equipment to the lottery shall report to the division any change in, addition to, or deletion from the information disclosed to the division in accordance with the provisions of subsections (1)(a), (1)(d), (1)(e), (2), and (7) of this section. The report shall be written and addressed to the division and shall be mailed or delivered to the division within thirty days of the date the change in, addition to, or deletion from the information takes place or becomes effective.

Any costs associated with an investigation regarding the information disclosed in the report shall be paid by the contractor who shall remit the costs within thirty days of billing by the division.

If the report contains any information, or if the division receives any information from any source other than the contractor, which information would have prohibited the director from awarding the contract to the contractor if the information had been provided or had been effective before the director awarded the contract, the director may terminate the contract following an investigation.

If the report contains any information, or if any information is discovered by the division from any source other than the contractor, which information would have given the director discretion to refuse to enter the contract had the information been provided or been effective before the director awarded the contract, the director, following an investigation, may terminate the contract.

Any termination shall be accomplished in accordance with the termination provisions of the contract.

Every contract for the supply of gaming equipment or material shall provide the following:

The director shall exclude from lottery facilities an employee of a contractor who has been convicted of a felony.

The director shall also exclude employees of a contractor from participating in activities involving the gaming materials or equipment supplied pursuant to the contract.

Each supplier, prior to entering into a contract to supply gaming materials or equipment, shall submit a set of fingerprints to the division. The division shall forward the fingerprints to the Colorado bureau of investigation for the purpose of conducting a state and national fingerprint-based criminal history record check utilizing records of the Colorado bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation. Only the actual costs of the record check shall be borne by the supplier. Nothing in this subsection (10) shall preclude the division from making further inquiries into the background of the supplier.

When the results of a fingerprint-based criminal history record check of a supplier performed pursuant to this subsection (10) reveal a record of arrest without a disposition, the division shall require the supplier to submit to a name-based judicial record check, as defined in section 22-2-119.3 (6)(d).

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, for purposes of this subsection (10), "supplier" means an individual or any person described in subsection (1)(a) or (1)(g) of this section.

The requirements of the "Procurement Code", articles 101 to 112 of title 24, shall apply to all contracts entered into by the lottery. The executive director shall ensure that any competitive solicitation process conducted by the lottery is designed to encourage broad vendor competition.

The evaluation team for any bid for a contract for services, equipment, or materials or for the purchase or lease of gaming equipment and materials, the amount of which bid is in excess of one million dollars, shall include an individual who is neither employed by nor affiliated with the division and who possesses specific expertise in the procurement of the services, equipment, or materials or in the purchase or lease of the gaming equipment or materials that are the subject of the bid. The individual shall be selected by the executive director in accordance with the requirements of this subsection (12).

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1027), ch. 31, p. 338, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(10)(a.5) added, (HB 19-1166), ch. 125, p. 564, § 66, effective April 18.

L. 2022:

(10)(a.5) amended, (HB 22-1270), ch. 114, p. 536, § 63, effective April 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 24-35-205 as it existed prior to 2018.

Cross references:

For those who serve as peace officers within the criminal code when enforcing laws and rules regarding the lottery, see § 16-2.5-121.

44-40-107. Licenses.

The director shall issue, suspend, revoke, and renew licenses for lottery sales agents pursuant to subsection (3) of this section and rules adopted by the commission. Licensing rules shall include requirements relating to the financial responsibility of the licensee, the accessibility of the licensee's place of business or activity to the public, the sufficiency of existing licenses to serve the public interest, the volume of expected sales, the character of the licensee, the security and efficient operation of the lottery, the licensed agent recovery reserve authorized in section 44-40-121, and other matters necessary to protect the public interest and trust in the lottery and to further the sales of lottery tickets or shares. Rules shall also require that licenses be prominently displayed in areas visible to the public.

A license shall be revoked upon a finding that the licensee:

Has provided false or misleading information to the division;

Has been convicted of any gambling-related offense;

Has endangered the security of the lottery;

Has become a person whose character is no longer consistent with the protection of the public interest and trust in the lottery; or

Has intentionally refused to pay a prize in his or her possession to a person entitled to receive the prize under this article 40.

A license may be suspended, revoked, or not renewed for any of the following causes:

A change of business location;

An insufficient sales volume;

A delinquency in remitting money owed to the lottery;

The endangering of the efficient operation of the lottery;

Any violation of this article 40 or any rule adopted pursuant to this article 40; or

Conviction of any felony.

Procedures for issuance, suspension, revocation, and renewal of licenses shall be in accordance with article 4 of title 24, and the director shall have all the powers and shall be subject to all the requirements of article 4 of title 24 in conducting any hearings relating to the granting, suspension, revocation, or renewal of licenses. When a felony conviction or a conviction involving fraud is an issue in the issuance, suspension, revocation, or renewal of a lottery sales agent's license, the director's determination shall be submitted to a three-member panel who shall approve or reject the determination. The panel's decision shall constitute final agency action for the purposes of section 24-4-106. The panel shall be composed of the chairman of the lottery commission, the executive director, and the secretary of state.

Licensed sales agents may include persons, firms, associations, or corporations, profit or nonprofit, but the following are ineligible for any license as a sales agent:

Any person who will engage in business exclusively as a lottery sales agent;

Any person who has been convicted of a gambling-related offense, notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-5-101;

Any person who is or has been a professional gambler or gambling promoter;

Any person who has engaged in bookmaking or any other form of illegal gambling;

Any person who is not of good character and reputation, notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-5-101, in the community where he or she resides;

Any person who has been convicted of a crime involving misrepresentation, notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-5-101;

Any firm or corporation in which a person defined in subsections (4)(b) to (4)(f) of this section has a proprietary, equitable, or credit interest;

Any organization in which a person defined in subsections (4)(b) to (4)(f) of this section is an officer, director, or managing agent, whether compensated or not; or

Any organization in which a person defined in subsections (4)(b) to (4)(f) of this section is to participate in the management or sales of lottery tickets or shares.

Licensed sales agents may include persons, firms, associations, or corporations, profit or nonprofit, but the following may be determined to be ineligible for any license as a sales agent:

Any person who has been convicted of a felony or a crime involving fraud, notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-5-101;

Any firm or corporation in which a person defined in subsection (5)(a) of this section has a proprietary, equitable, or credit interest;

Any organization in which a person defined in subsection (5)(a) of this section is an officer, director, or managing agent, whether compensated or not; or

Any organization in which a person defined in subsection (5)(a) of this section is to participate in the management or sales of lottery tickets or shares.

Each licensed sales agent shall keep a complete set of books of account, correspondence, and all other records necessary to show fully the lottery transactions of the licensee, all of which shall be open at all times during business hours for the inspection and examination of the division or its duly authorized representatives. The division may require any licensed sales agent to furnish the information that the division considers necessary for the proper administration of this article 40 and may require an audit to be made of the books of account and records when the division considers necessary by an auditor, selected by the director, who shall likewise have access to all the books and records of the licensee, and the licensee may be required to pay the expense thereof.

All licenses for lottery sales agents shall specify the place that sales shall take place, and no license shall be effective upon residential premises.

The costs of any investigation into the background of an applicant seeking a license for a lottery sales agent shall be assessed against the applicant and shall be paid by the applicant at the time of billing by the state. The investigation may be conducted by the division or the attorney general. Investigators shall have peace officer authority during the period of investigation.

If there are more applications to operate lotto than there are outlets available, then at least one hundred locations will be decided by a drawing by lot with the balance of all lotto outlets to be located at the direction of the division. Any person licensed as a lottery sales agent pursuant to the provision of this section shall be eligible to enter into this drawing by lot to determine if the person will be allowed to operate a lotto game at the same location.

If the rental payments for the business premises of any lottery sales agent are based in whole or in part on a percentage of retail sales, and the computation of retail sales in the rental agreement does not specifically include the sale of tickets or shares in the lottery, the compensation received by the sales agent, as determined by the commission pursuant to section 44-40-109 (2)(h), and not the gross revenues from the sale of lottery tickets or shares shall be the amount of the retail sale for the purpose of computing the rental payment.

Each applicant for a lottery sales agent license, with the submission of the application, shall submit a set of fingerprints to the division. The division shall forward the fingerprints to the Colorado bureau of investigation for the purpose of conducting a state and national fingerprint-based criminal history record check utilizing records of the Colorado bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation. Only the actual costs of the record check shall be borne by the applicant. Nothing in this subsection (11) shall preclude the division from making further inquiries into the background of the applicant.

When the results of a fingerprint-based criminal history record check of an applicant performed pursuant to this subsection (11) reveal a record of arrest without a disposition, the division shall require the applicant to submit to a name-based judicial record check, as defined in section 22-2-119.3 (6)(d).

For purposes of this subsection (11), "applicant" means an individual or each officer or director of a firm, association, or corporation that is applying for a license pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1027), ch. 31, p. 342, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(11)(a.5) added, (HB 19-1166), ch. 125, p. 564, § 67, effective April 18.

L. 2022:

(11)(a.5) amended, (HB 22-1270), ch. 114, p. 537, § 64, effective April 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 24-35-206 as it existed prior to 2018.

Cross references:

For those who serve as peace officers within the criminal code when enforcing laws and rules regarding the lottery, see § 16-2.5-121.

44-40-108. Colorado lottery commission - creation.

There is hereby created, within the state lottery division, the Colorado lottery commission, consisting of five members, all of whom shall be citizens of the United States and residents of this state, appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate. No member shall have been convicted of a felony or gambling-related offense, notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-5-101. No more than three of the five members shall be members of the same political party. A chairman and a vice-chairman of the commission shall be chosen from the membership by a majority of the members at the first meeting of each fiscal year.

At least one member of the commission shall have been a law enforcement officer for not less than five years; at least one member shall be an attorney admitted to the practice of law in Colorado for not less than five years; and at least one member shall be a certified public accountant who has practiced accountancy in Colorado for at least five years.

All members shall be appointed for terms of four years. No member of the commission shall be eligible to serve more than two terms.

Any vacancy on the commission shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment.

Any member of the commission may be removed by the governor at any time and for any reason.

Commission members shall receive as compensation for their services up to one hundred dollars per month for each month in which there is an official commission meeting and shall be reimbursed for necessary traveling and other reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties. Upon appointment, and prior to confirmation by the senate, each member shall file with the secretary of state a financial disclosure statement in the form required to be filed by elected state officials. The statement shall be renewed as of each January 1 during the member's term of office. The chairperson of the lottery commission shall also be reimbursed for necessary traveling and other reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of his or her duties related to his or her participation on the three-member panel established in sections 44-40-106 (5)(a) and 44-40-107 (3).

The commission shall hold at least one meeting each month and any additional meetings that may be prescribed by rules of the commission. In addition, special meetings may be called by the chairman, any two commission members, or the director, upon delivery of seventy-two hours' written notice to each member. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-6-402, in emergency situations in which a majority of the commission certifies that exigencies of time require that the commission meet without delay, the requirements of public notice and of seventy-two hours' written notice to members may be dispensed with, and commission members as well as the public shall receive the notice as is reasonable under the circumstances.

For purposes of part 4 of article 6 of title 24, the commission shall be a state public body, as defined in section 24-6-402 (1)(d), regardless of whether the state lottery division and the Colorado lottery commission constitute an enterprise pursuant to section 44-40-102 (1).

A majority of the commission shall constitute a quorum, and the concurrence of a majority of the commission shall be required for any final determination by the commission. The commission shall keep a complete and accurate audio record of all its meetings for a period of at least three years.

Source:

L. 2018:

(3) amended, (SB 18-066), ch. 172, p. 1203, § 2, effective August 8; entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1027), ch. 31, p. 345, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:

(3) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 92, § 125, effective February 25.